Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-376
Operation of vehicle without registration; In Transit; display; records required; proof of ownership.

(1) Subject to all the provisions of law relating to motor vehicles and trailers not inconsistent with this section, any motor vehicle dealer or trailer dealer who is regularly engaged within this state in the business of buying and selling motor vehicles and trailers, who regularly maintains within this state an established place of business, and who desires to effect delivery of any motor vehicle or trailer bought or sold by such dealer from the point where purchased or sold to points within or outside this state may, solely for the purpose of such delivery by such dealer, such dealer's agent, or a bona fide purchaser, operate such motor vehicle or tow such trailer on the highways of this state without charge or registration of such motor vehicle or trailer.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2029, an In Transit shall be displayed as follows on a motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section, other than an autocycle or a motorcycle:

(a)(i) On the front of the motor vehicle or on the front window of the motor vehicle; and

(ii) On the rear of the motor vehicle or on the rear window of the motor vehicle; or

(b) On the rear side windows of the motor vehicle.

(3) Beginning on January 1, 2029, an In Transit shall be displayed on the rear window, a rear side window, or the rear of a motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) For a trailer described in subsection (1) of this section, an In Transit shall be displayed on the rear of the trailer.

(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, on the In Transit shall be plainly printed in black letters the words "In Transit".

(b) For an autocycle or a motorcycle, the In Transit may be one-half the size required for other motor vehicles.

(c) An In Transit shall include a registration number that is different for each motor vehicle or trailer for which an In Transit is issued. The contents and the numbering system of the In Transit shall be as prescribed by the department.

(6) Each dealer issuing an In Transit shall keep a record of the registration number of the In Transit on the invoice for the sale.

(7)(a) An In Transit shall allow the operation of the motor vehicle or the towing of the trailer for a period of thirty days in order to effect proper registration of the new or used motor vehicle or trailer.

(b) When any person, firm, or corporation has had a motor vehicle or trailer previously registered and license plates assigned to such person, firm, or corporation, such motor vehicle may be operated or such trailer may be towed for a period of thirty days in order to effect the transfer of license plates to the new or used motor vehicle or trailer.

(c) Upon demand of proper authorities, there shall be presented by the person in charge of such motor vehicle or trailer, for examination, a duly executed bill of sale therefor or other satisfactory evidence of the right of possession by such person of such motor vehicle or trailer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 76;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 41.
July 18, 2026
A vehicle may be operated for 15 days without being registered pursuant to section 60-302, provided that it properly displays "In Transit" decals. State v. Childs, 242 Neb. 426, 495 N.W.2d 475 (1993).

This section provides for in-transit tags to be issued by a licensed dealer; it does not allow private sellers to issue in-transit tags. Thus, such handwritten tags are not entitled to the presumption of compliance that we have afforded dealer-issued tags. The law enforcement officer has reasonable suspicion to stop a motor vehicle when he or she sees such vehicle being operated on the public streets without license plates and without dealer-issued in-transit tags. Upon demand, the driver of such vehicle must show documents proving compliance with motor vehicle registration laws. State v. Kling, 8 Neb. App. 631, 599 N.W.2d 240 (1999).

"Display" of in-transit decals as described in this section logically implies a display of the decal which is visible. State v. Reiter, 3 Neb. App. 153, 524 N.W.2d 575 (1994).